Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2714
Powers of custodian.

(1) A custodian, acting in a custodial capacity, has all the rights, powers, and authority over custodial property that unmarried adult owners have over their own property, but a custodian may exercise those rights, powers, and authority in that capacity only.

(2) This section does not relieve a custodian from liability for breach of section 43-2713.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 14.